Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-141
Hearing; procedure.

The county board or hearing examiner, as the case may be, shall use the following procedure for all hearings:

(1) Tape-record the hearing;

(2) Make a decision within thirty days following the hearing;

(3) Make the decision based upon the evidence adduced and the law;

(4) Provide the claimant a written copy of the decision setting forth findings and conclusions; and

(5) Preserve the tape of the hearing and all exhibits offered at the hearing for not less than sixty days following entry of the hearing decision.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 11.